Illinois, session 104th, HB1160.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 1. Short title. This Act may be cited as the 5Protect the Flag Act. 6    Section 5. Definition. As used in this Act, "institution 7of higher education" means a publicly or privately operated 8university or college in this State, a publicly or privately 9operated business, technical, or vocational school in this 10State, or any other publicly or privately operated educational 11institution offering degrees and instruction beyond the 12secondary school level in this State. 13    Section 10. Restriction on funding. An institution of 14higher education that, pursuant to an official policy of the 15institution of higher education to prohibit the display of the 16flag of the United States by the institution of higher 17education, removes, censors, takes down, prohibits, or 18otherwise halts display of the flag of the United States is 19ineligible to receive State funds until the institution of 20higher education reports to the General Assembly and the Board 21of Higher Education the complete and proper reinstatement, by 22the institution of higher education in its official capacity,   HB1160- 2 -LRB104 06346 LNS 16382 b1of the flag of the United States at any and all locations on 2campus property from which a previously displayed flag of the 3United States was removed, censored, taken down, prohibited, 4or otherwise halted from display pursuant to an official 5policy of the institution of higher education to prohibit the 6display of the flag of the United States by the institution of 7higher education.